Louisiana, session 2026, SB399.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. Part III-D of Chapter 5 of Title 17 of the Louisiana Revised Statutes of
1950, comprised of R.S. 17:1828 through 1828.12, is hereby enacted to read as follows:
PART III-D. RESEARCH AND EDUCATION PROTECTION ACT OF 2026
§1828. Short title; purpose
A. This Part shall be known and cited as the "Research and Education
Protection Act of 2026".
B. The purpose of this Part is to protect Louisiana's research and
educational systems from malicious influence from foreign adversaries.
§1828.1. Definitions
As used in this Part, the following terms have the following meanings
unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:
Page 1 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
(1) "Academic partnership" shall mean a formal collaboration between
two or more educational or research institutions to achieve shared goals in
teaching, research, or innovation.
(2) "Affiliate organization" shall mean any entity under the control of
or established for the benefit of an organization required to report under this
Part, including a direct-support organization.
(3) "Agreement" means a written or spoken statement of mutual interest
in cultural exchange, academic, or research collaboration.
(4) "Contract" shall mean any agreement for the acquisition by
purchase, lease, or barter of property or services, for the direct benefit or use
of either of the parties.
(5) "Council" shall mean the Louisiana Higher Education Research
Security Council established under this Part.
(6) "Direct-support organization" shall mean an organization which is
organized and operated to receive, hold, invest, and administer property and to
make expenditures to or for the benefit of a state college, university, or other
educational institution or for the benefit of a research and development park or
research and development authority affiliated with a state college, university,
or other educational institution.
(7) "Foreign adversary" shall mean any foreign government or foreign
nongovernment person determined by the United States Secretary of Commerce
to have engaged in a long term pattern or serious instances of conduct
significantly adverse to the national security of the United States or security and
safety of United States persons as listed in 15 CFR 791.4.
(8) "Foreign agent" shall mean any officer, employee, proxy, servant,
delegate, or representative of a foreign government.
(9) "Foreign government" shall mean the government of any country,
nation, or group of nations, or any province or other political subdivision of any
country or nation, other than the government of the United States, including
any agent of such foreign government.
Page 2 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
(10) "Foreign instrumentality" shall mean any agency, bureau, ministry,
component, institution, association, or any legal, commercial, or business
organization, corporation, firm, or entity that is substantially owned, controlled,
sponsored, commanded, managed, or dominated by a foreign government.
(11) "Foreign source" shall mean any of the following:
(a) A foreign government or an agency of a foreign government.
(b) A legal entity, governmental or otherwise, created solely under the
laws of a foreign state or states.
(c) An individual who is not a citizen or a national of the United States
or a territory or protectorate of the United States.
(d) A partnership, association, corporation, organization, or any other
combination of persons organized under the law or having its principal place
of business in a foreign country, or a subsidiary of such entity.
(e) An agent, including a subsidiary or an affiliate of a foreign legal
entity, acting on behalf of a foreign source.
(f) A political party or member of a political party.
(12) "Gift" shall mean any gift, grant, endowment, award, or donation
of money or thing of economic value, or any combination thereof, including a
conditional or unconditional pledge of such gift, endowment, award, or
donation.
(13) "Grant" shall mean a transfer of money for a specified purpose,
including a conditional gift.
(14) "Institution of higher education" shall mean a state college or
university or an independent nonprofit college or university that is located in
and chartered by the state and grants baccalaureate or higher degrees, or any
other institution that has a physical presence in the state and is required to
report foreign gifts or contracts pursuant to 20 U.S.C. 1011f, or an affiliate
organization to a covered institution.
(15) "Interest" in an entity shall mean any direct or indirect investment
in or loan to the entity valued at five percent or more of the entity's net worth,
Page 3 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
or any form of direct or indirect control exerting similar or greater influence
on the governance of the entity.
(16) "Obtain or use" shall mean any manner of:
(a) Taking or exercising control over property.
(b) Making any unauthorized use, disposition, or transfer of property.
(c) Obtaining property by fraud, willful misrepresentation of a future
act, or false promise.
(d) Conduct previously known as stealing, larceny, purloining,
abstracting, embezzlement, misapplication, misappropriation, conversion, or
obtaining money or property by false pretenses, fraud, or deception; or other
conduct similar in nature.
(17) "Partnership" shall mean a faculty or student exchange program,
a study abroad program, a matriculation program, a recruiting program, or a
dual degree program.
(18) "Person" shall mean any natural person, corporation, business
trust, estate, trust, partnership, association, joint venture, government,
governmental subdivision or agency, or any other legal or commercial entity.
(19) "Pledge" shall mean a promise, an agreement, or an expressed
intention to give a gift.
(20) "Political party" shall mean an organization or combination of
individuals whose aim or purpose is, or who is engaged in any activity devoted
in whole or in part to, the establishment, administration, control, or acquisition
of administration or control of a government of a foreign country or a
subdivision thereof.
(21) "Research partnership" shall mean a collaborative agreement
between a Louisiana institution of higher education and another institution of
higher education, research institute, government agency, nonprofit
organization, or private sector company.
(22) "Trade secret" shall mean the whole or any portion or phase of any
formula, pattern, device, combination of devices, or compilation of information
Page 4 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
which is for use, or is used, in the operation of a business and which provides
the business an advantage, or an opportunity to obtain an advantage, over those
who do not know or use it. The term shall include any scientific, technical, or
commercial information, including financial information. It also includes any
design, process, procedure, list of suppliers, list of customers, business code, or
improvement thereof, whether tangible or intangible, and regardless of how it
is stored, compiled, or memorialized physically, electronically, graphically,
photographically, or in writing. Irrespective of novelty, invention, patentability,
the state of the prior art, and the level of skill in the business, art, or field to
which the subject matter pertains; a trade secret is considered to be:
(a) Secret.
(b) Of value.
(c) For use or in use by a business, institution of higher education,
research center, nonprofit, or other entity.
(d) Of advantage to the business, institution of higher education,
research center, nonprofit, or other entity; or providing an opportunity to
obtain an advantage over those who do not know or use it.
(e) When the owner takes measures to prevent it from becoming
available to persons other than those selected by the owner to have access for
limited purposes.
(23) "Traffic" shall mean:
(a) To sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of
property.
(b) To buy, receive, possess, obtain control of, or use property with the
intent to sell, transfer, distribute, dispense, or otherwise dispose of such
property.
(24) "United Front Political Influence System" shall mean the Chinese
Communist Party's extensive network of organizations operating in parallel to
the People's Republic of China's foreign ministry and intelligence services and
seeking to influence universities, think tanks, civic groups, other prominent
Page 5 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
individuals and institutions, and public opinion broadly. It includes but is not
limited to the Chinese People's Political Consultative Conference, the Overseas
Chinese Affairs Office, the United Front Work Department, the Chinese
Overseas Exchange Association, the China Overseas Friendship Association,
and the All-China Federation of Returned Overseas Chinese, and any
subsidiary or affiliate organization thereof.
§1828.2. Louisiana Higher Education Research Security Council; creation;
powers
A. The Louisiana Higher Education Research Security Council is hereby
established for the purpose of promoting secure academic research at
institutions of higher education while mitigating the risk of foreign espionage
and interference.
B. The council shall be composed of the following members:
(1) The lieutenant governor, or his designee.
(2) The attorney general, or his designee.
(3) A representative from the Board of Regents.
(4) One research security officer appointed by the Board of Supervisors
for the University of Louisiana System.
(5) One research security officer appointed by the Board of Supervisors
of Louisiana State University and Agricultural and Mechanical College.
(6) One research security officer appointed by the Board of Supervisors
of Southern University and Agricultural and Mechanical College.
(7) One research security officer appointed by the Board of Supervisors
of Community and Technical Colleges.
(8) One research security officer appointed by the Board of Directors of
the Louisiana Association of Independent Colleges and Universities.
(9) One additional research security officer appointed by each governing
board of a university that oversees one or more medical schools.
(10) Three faculty members with research experience, one designated by
the chief academic officer of the Louisiana State University System, one
Page 6 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
designated by the chief academic officer of the University of Louisiana System,
and one designated by the chief academic officer of the Southern University
System.
(11) The chairman of the House Select Committee on Homeland
Security, or his designee.
(12) The chairman of the Senate Select Committee on Homeland
Security, or his designee.
(13) The superintendent of the Louisiana State Police, or his designee.
(14) The chief information officer of the office of technology services, or
his designee.
(15) The lead special agent of the Federal Bureau of Investigation, New
Orleans Field Office, or his designee, shall be invited as a nonvoting ex officio
member.
(16) One designated research security officer or senior security officer
or senior research administrator from each institution that engages in
sponsored research that is a member of the Louisiana Association of
Independent Colleges and Universities.
C. The council member appointed by the Board of Regents shall serve
as the chairman of the council. The Board of Regents shall provide staff to the
council.
D. The council shall meet at least quarterly, but may meet more often
upon the call of the presiding officer, who shall call a meeting upon the request
of a majority of the members. Members of the council shall serve at the pleasure
of the appointing authority and vacancies shall be filled in the manner of the
original appointment.
E. The council shall:
(1) Develop or adopt a model research security policy for Louisiana
institutions of higher education to improve research security.
(2) Develop, offer or otherwise provide an annual training program for
institutions of higher education's research security officers that includes
Page 7 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
background and academic history checks of researchers, research security and
integrity tools, and software that must be used to prevent the loss of intellectual
capital.
(3) Vet and review any gift, contract, or academic or research
partnership to an institution of higher education from a foreign adversary
source. The vetting and review shall exclude information about trade secrets
and protected information pursuant to nondisclosure or confidentiality
agreements.
(4) Subject to appropriation, engage an intelligence firm that specializes
in identifying national security threats from foreign adversary sources.
(5) Not later than January thirty-first of each even-numbered year, the
council shall prepare and submit to the governor, the attorney general's office,
and the Senate and House committees on education a report on the status of
research security at institutions of higher education and any associated
recommendations.
§1828.3. Approval requirements for gifts, contracts, research partnerships, and
academic partnerships from foreign adversaries
A. Any institution of higher education that is offered directly or
indirectly any gift, contract, or academic or research partnership with any value
from a foreign adversary source shall reject such proposed gift, contract, or
academic or research partnership unless the following conditions are met by the
institution of higher education:
(1) Within thirty days of receiving a proposal for the gift, contract,
academic or research partnership, the institution shall request an assessment
from federal law enforcement on potential national security risks, and after
receiving the assessment, it shall be submitted to the Louisiana Higher
Education Research Security Council along with the request for approval of the
proposed gift, contract, academic, or research partnership. The council shall
have veto authority over such academic and research partnerships with a simple
majority vote of all council members.
Page 8 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
(2) The Board of Regents shall maintain a public web portal disclosing
proposed gifts, contracts, or academic or research partnerships from foreign
adversary sources described in this Section, along with the final decision on
whether to allow the relevant institution of higher education to accept the gift.
(3) For purposes of this Section, a gift, contract, or academic or research
partnership received from a foreign adversary source through an intermediary
shall be considered an indirect gift, contract, or partnership with the institution
of higher education, and is subject to the approval process described in this
Section.
(4) Upon the request of the governor, the president of the Senate, or the
speaker of the House of Representatives, the legislative auditor, as applicable,
must inspect or audit a gift, contract, or academic or research partnership.
B. An institution of higher education or employee thereof shall not enter
into any contract, academic partnership, or research partnership with a foreign
adversary source for any project that is funded in whole or in part by the
United States Department of War, United States Department of Energy, or
United States Department of Health and Human Services.
C. An institution of higher education or employee thereof shall not enter
into any contract, academic partnership, or research partnership with a foreign
adversary source with known links to the foreign adversary's military or
intelligence apparatus.
D. All institutions of higher education shall include in their employment
policies a prohibition on their faculty or employees taking part in any foreign
recruitment program by a foreign adversary nation.
§1828.4. Enforcement; penalties; rewards
A. Upon receiving a referral from an officer of an institution of higher
education or any sworn complaint based upon substantive information and
reasonable belief, the attorney general must investigate an allegation of a
violation of this Part.
B. Any agent or compliance officer authorized by an institution of higher
Page 9 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
education may request records relevant to any reasonable suspicion of a
violation of this Part. An institution of higher education shall provide the
required records within ten days after such request or later as agreed to by the
entity investigating the institution of higher education.
C. Failure to make a disclosure required under this Part or failure to
provide records requested under Subsection B of this Section constitutes a civil
violation punishable upon a final administrative finding.
D. A final order determining a violation by an institution of higher
education must include a determination of the identity of the officer responsible
for acceptance of the undisclosed gifts or contracts, or entrance into the
undisclosed academic or research partnership. Such order shall also include a
referral to the system president or other officer authorized to suspend or
remove from public office the officer responsible for acceptance of the
undisclosed gifts or contracts or entrance into the undisclosed academic or
research partnership. A copy of such referral shall be provided to the president
of the Senate, the speaker of the House of Representatives, the governor, and
the Louisiana Higher Education Research Security Council for oversight of
such suspension and removal authority.
E. A whistleblower who reports an undisclosed foreign gift or contract
may also report such undisclosed gift or contract to the attorney general's office
and retain whistleblower protection under R.S. 23:967. Such whistleblower shall
be entitled to receive a reward in the amount of twenty-five percent of any
penalty recovered. The attorney general is authorized to incur expenditures to
provide such reward from the penalty recovery. The reward may be paid
through an intermediate attorney or trustee designated by the whistleblower.
F. The council may adopt policies, as applicable, to implement this
Section. Institutions of higher education shall be in compliance with such
policies.
§1828.5. International cultural exchange agreements and student associations
A. An institution of higher education may not participate in any cultural
Page 10 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
exchange agreement with a foreign source from a foreign adversary, or any
entity controlled by foreign adversaries unless it addresses an overwhelmingly
under-addressed state or national need and it avoids:
(1) Constraining the freedom of contract of such public entity.
(2) Allowing the curricula or values of a program in the state to be
directed, controlled, or influenced by the foreign adversaries.
(3) Promoting an agenda detrimental to the safety or security of
Louisiana, its residents, or the United States.
B. Prior to the execution of any cultural exchange agreement with a
foreign source from a foreign adversary, the substance of the agreement shall
be shared with a federal law enforcement agency. If the federal agency provides
information suggesting that such an agreement promotes an agenda detrimental
to the safety or security of Louisiana, the United States, or its residents, the
institution of higher education may not enter into the agreement.
C. Prior to the execution of any cultural exchange agreement with a
foreign source from a foreign adversary, the substance of the agreement shall
be shared with the Louisiana Higher Education Research Security Council. If
the council provides information suggesting that such an agreement promotes
an agenda detrimental to the safety or security of Louisiana, the United States,
or its residents, the institution of higher education may not enter into the
agreement.
D. Each institution of higher education shall submit the information
required in this Section to the Board of Regents by July first of each year.
E. By January thirty-first of each year, the Board of Regents shall
submit a report to the governor, the president of the Senate, and the speaker of
the House of Representatives relating to partnerships and agreements of
institutions of higher education made with educational institutions or other
institutions based in foreign adversaries. At a minimum, the report shall include
the following information for the previous fiscal year:
(1) Data reflecting any grant program, agreement, partnership, or
Page 11 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
contract between an institution of higher education and any college, university,
or entity that is based in or controlled by a foreign adversary.
(2) Data reflecting any office, campus, or physical location used or
maintained by an institution of higher education in a foreign adversary.
(3) The date on which any such grant program, agreement, partnership,
or contract reported pursuant to this Section is expected to terminate.
F. No student or scholar association affiliated with any institution of
higher education may accept any gift or grant from a foreign source of a foreign
adversary or enter into any contract or agreement with a foreign source of a
foreign adversary, or be directed or controlled by the government of a foreign
adversary or any agent thereof.
(1) Any violation of this Section shall result in the institution of higher
education ending any affiliation with the student or scholar association.
(2) For purposes of this Subsection, member dues or fees shall not be
considered a gift or grant from a foreign source of a foreign adversary.
G. The governing board of each institution of higher education shall
adopt rules and regulations, respectively, to administer this Section in
consultation with the council and a third-party advisor, including but not
limited to an intelligence firm.
§1828.6. Foreign travel and gifts; prohibition
A. Unless requested by a federal agency, the governor, the president of
the Senate, or the speaker of the House of Representatives, an employee,
researcher, or volunteer of an institution of higher education of this state may
not:
(1) Accept transportation or lodging in a country that is a foreign
adversary and that is paid for by the foreign adversary or a foreign adversary
source because of the employee's or volunteer's position with the state or a
political subdivision.
(2) Accept a gift or item of value from a person representing a foreign
adversary for any purpose, including to pay for travel expenses or as
Page 12 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
reimbursement for the costs of attending a conference or other event in a
country that is a foreign adversary or that is hosted on behalf of a foreign
adversary or a principal of a foreign adversary.
B. An employee or volunteer of an institution of higher education of this
state shall report to the Louisiana Higher Education Research Security Council,
in the form and manner the council requires, each interaction, communication,
or meeting the employee, researcher, or volunteer has with a person acting on
behalf of a foreign adversary not later than thirty days after the date of the
interaction, communication, or meeting. The legislative auditor shall make
available a report under this Subsection to the attorney general and the
Department of Public Safety and Corrections on request.
§1828.7. Research partnerships
A. An institution of higher education shall only enter into a new or renew
an existing research partnership with an academic or research institution,
business, or nonprofit located in a foreign adversary if the institution of higher
education maintains sufficient structural safeguards to protect the state
institution's intellectual property, the security of the state of Louisiana, and the
national security interests of the United States. The Louisiana Higher Education
Research Security Council shall only approve an institution of higher
education's partnership if the council determines the partnership meets the
safeguard requirements prescribed under this Section. The safeguard
requirements shall include but not be limited to the following:
(1) Compliance with all federal requirements, including the
requirements of federal research sponsors and federal export control agencies,
including regulations regarding international traffic in arms and export
administration regulations, and economic and trade sanctions administered by
the office of foreign assets control of the United States Department of the
Treasury.
(2) Annual formal institution level programs for faculty on conflicts of
interest and conflicts of commitment.
Page 13 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
(3) An overwhelming state interest to enter into the research or academic
partnership.
(4) There are no alternative institutions to engage with for a similar
research or academic partnership.
(5) A formalized foreign visitor process and uniform visiting scholar
agreement.
B. The Louisiana Higher Education Research Security Council shall
have full discretion to reject or terminate any research partnership between an
institution of higher education and an academic or research institution located
in a foreign adversary. However, prior to denying or terminating any
partnership, the council shall provide written notice, specific findings, an
opportunity for the institution to respond, and an opportunity for
administrative appeal.
C. The Board of Regents, in consultation with the office of the governor,
shall create a research and cultural exchange policy which shall prioritize
research partnerships and academic exchange agreements with America's
military treaty allies, Israel, and the Republic of China (Taiwan).
§1828.8. Foreign educational software
A. The Board of Regents, in conjunction with the office of technology
services, shall conduct a thorough review of all educational software used by
institutions of higher education that may be linked to foreign adversaries. The
Board of Regents, in conjunction with the office of technology services, shall
develop a plan to eliminate the usage of educational software from foreign
adversary countries, as defined in 15 CFR 791.4, in each of the respective
systems.
B. The Board of Regents, in conjunction with the office of technology
services, shall promulgate rules and regulations prohibiting the future
contracting with educational technology and software-providing entities
domiciled in, or owned by companies or other entities domiciled in, foreign
adversary countries as defined in 15 CFR 791.4, in each of the respective
Page 14 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
systems.
C. This Section shall apply only to contracts entered into or renewed
after January 1, 2027.
§1828.9. Protection of higher education from foreign adversary influence
A. The management board for each public institution of higher education
in this state shall adopt and implement policies consistent with this Section to
safeguard institutional integrity, research security, and compliance with
applicable federal law.
B.(1) No Confucious Institute, or any program, institute, center,
association, or other entity that is directly established, funded, substantially
directed, or controlled by any of the following entities shall be permitted to
operate on, conduct activities on, or use any property owned or controlled by
a public postsecondary education institution in this state:
(a) The government of the People's Republic of China.
(b) The Chinese Communist Party.
(c) The People's Liberation Army.
(d) Any intelligence agency of the People's Republic of China.
(e) Any subordinate or affiliated organization of the organizations
provided for in Subparagraphs (a) through (d) of this Paragraph, including the
United Front Political Influence System and any of its subsidiaries and affiliated
organizations.
(2) For purposes of this Section, entities which shall be considered
"substantially directed or controlled" include but are not limited to the
following:
(a) Entities appearing on the United States Department of Commerce
Entity List as provided in 15 CFR 744.16.
(b) Entities appearing on the United States Department of Commerce
Military End-User List as provided in 15 CFR 744.21.
(c) Entities formally designated by the United States Department of
State, Department of Commerce, or Department of Defense, pursuant to
Page 15 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
publicly issued determinations, as participating in a military-civil fusion
program or malign foreign talent recruitment program.
(d) Entities receiving funding from a foreign source of a foreign
adversary country without approval of the Research Security Council.
(e) Entities directly affiliated with and reporting to the Chinese
Communist Party's United Front Political Influence System.
C.(1) Each applicant for enrollment, employment, or research funding
at a public postsecondary education institution shall disclose, under penalty of
perjury pursuant to Subsection E of this Section, either of the following:
(a) Current or former participation in a malign foreign talent
recruitment program identified by the United States government.
(b) Current or former affiliation with an entity described in Paragraph
(B)(2) of this Section.
(2) Disclosure requirements under this Section shall be applied
uniformly to all applicants and shall not be based solely on citizenship,
nationality, or country of origin.
D.(1) An institution shall conduct an individualized, risk-based
assessment of any disclosed information under Subsection C of this Section.
(2) Enrollment, employment, or research opportunities shall be denied,
conditioned, or terminated only if the institution determines, based on specific
and articulable facts, that the disclosed information presents a credible risk of
any of the following:
(a) Espionage or malign influence operations.
(b) Unlawful technology transfer in violation of export control laws.
(c) Compromise of research integrity.
(d) Violation of federal or state law.
(3) Mere past, incidental, or nominal membership in a political
organization, including the Chinese Communist Party, shall not solely constitute
sufficient grounds for denial, conditioning, or termination.
E. An applicant who knowingly provides false or materially misleading
Page 16 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
information in a disclosure required under this Section shall be subject to
disciplinary action, up to and including denial or termination of enrollment,
employment, or research participation, consistent with institutional policy and
applicable law. The applicant will also be liable for committing the crime of
perjury.
F. All policies adopted pursuant to this Section shall be applied in a
manner that comports with all of the following:
(1) Does not discriminate on the basis of race, ethnicity, national origin,
or political affiliation.
(2) Is consistent with the Constitution and laws of the United States and
this state.
(3) Incorporates due process protections, including written notice of the
basis for any adverse action and a meaningful opportunity to respond prior to
the denial or termination of enrollment, employment, or research opportunities,
except where immediate action is required to comply with federal law or to
address an imminent threat to public safety or national security.
§1828.10. Theft of trade secrets
Any theft of trade secrets or trafficking thereof from a Louisiana
institution of higher education on behalf of a foreign source of a foreign
adversary nation shall be charged as a crime under R.S. 14:67 with a penalty
one classification level higher than theft of equal value covered under R.S.
14:67. For theft of trade secrets of twenty-five thousand dollars or more, the
penalty shall be imprisonment at hard labor for not less than five years and not
more than twenty-five years.
§1828.11. Severability
If any provision of this Part, or the application of any provision to any
person or circumstance, is held to be invalid, the remainder of this Part and the
application of its provisions to any other person or circumstance shall not be
affected thereby.
§1828.12. Existing policy
Page 17 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 399 ENROLLED
Any gift, contract, academic partnership, or research partnership in
existence on January 1, 2027, may continue but shall not be renewed except
through the process set forth in this Chapter.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective on January 1, 2027. If vetoed by the
governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on
the day following such approval by the legislature or January 1, 2027, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 18 of 18
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.